Utah statutes.
7-7-19.   Record and accounting requirements -- Valuation of assets.
(1)  Every association shall keep at the home office correct and complete
books of accounts, membership or stockholder records, and minutes of the
proceedings of members, stockholders, and directors. Complete records of all
business transacted at the home office shall be maintained at the home office.
Control records of all business transacted at each branch office or agency
shall be maintained at the home office.
(2)  Each branch office shall keep detailed records of all transactions at
that branch office and shall furnish full control records to the home office.
(3)  Each agent of an association shall prepare an original record of each
business transaction of the association conducted by the agent and shall
report promptly to the home office.  Complete detailed permanent records of
the transactions are not required to be maintained at the agency, but may be
maintained at a branch or home office of the association.
(4)  Every association shall close its books at the close of business at least
annually or more often if required for all associations by the commissioner.
(5)  No association by any system of accounting or any device of bookkeeping
shall, either directly or indirectly, enter any of its assets upon its books
in the name of any other person, partnership, association, or corporation or
under any title or designation that is not fairly descriptive of the assets.
(6)  The commissioner, after a determination of value made in accordance with
this chapter, may order that assets, individually or in the aggregate, to the
extent that the assets are overvalued on an association's books, be charged
off, or that a special reserve or reserves equal to the overvaluation be set
up by transfers from undivided profits or reserves.
(7)  An association shall not carry any real estate on its books at a sum in
excess of the total amount invested by the association on account of that real
estate, including advances, costs, and improvements but excluding accrued but
uncollected interest.
(8)  Every association shall have appraised each parcel of real estate
acquired at the time of acquisition.  The report of each such appraisal shall
be submitted in writing to the board of directors and shall be kept in the
records of the association.
(9)  Every association shall maintain complete loan and investment records in
a manner satisfactory to the commissioner.  Each record of a real estate loan
or other secured loan or investment shall contain documentation to the
satisfaction of the commissioner of the type, adequacy and complexion of the
security.
(10)  Every mutual association shall maintain membership records, which shall
show the name and address of the members, the status of each member as a
savings account holder, or an obligor, or a savings account holder and
obligor, and the date membership began.  In the case of a member holding a
savings account, the association shall obtain a savings account contract,
which may be a signature card, containing the signature of each holder of the
account or his duly authorized representative, and shall preserve the contract
in the records of the association.
(11)  Every capital stock association shall maintain a register of investors
and stock transfers which shows the name and address of the stockholder, the
type of stock and voting status of the stockholder, and the date each share of
stock was acquired.
(12)  Every association shall use such forms and keep such records, including
without limitation, those of its members or stockholders, as the commissioner
may from time to time require.
